Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1704
Civil action; damages.

(1) A person aggrieved by a violation of section 86-1703 may bring a civil action against the social media company or third-party vendor which engaged in the violation to recover such relief as may be appropriate.

(2) In an action under this section, appropriate relief includes:

(a) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as may be appropriate;

(b) Damages under subsection (3) of this section; and

(c) At the discretion of the court, reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably incurred.

(3)(a) An individual whose information was retained in violation of subdivision (1)(b) of section 86-1703 may recover actual damages caused by such violation.

(b) A minor or a parent of such minor aggrieved by any other violation of section 86-1703 may recover actual damages caused by such violation.

Laws 2025, LB383, § 29.
July 1, 2026